Utah statutes.
59-13-211.   Distributor's records -- Audit requirements -- Deposit of revenues with treasurer -- Dedicated credits.

(1)  A distributor who does not maintain adequate motor fuel records at one location in this state so that an audit of the records may be made, may be required to:

(a)  forward the necessary records to Salt Lake City; or

(b)  pay the necessary expenses of an auditor to make the examination at the proper division office. 

(2)  Funds collected under this section:

(a)  shall be deposited with the state treasurer; and

(b)  are dedicated credits for the commission.

